Utah statutes.
31A-27a-103.   Insurer receivership laws.

(1)  The state's insurer receivership laws consists of:

(a)  this chapter; and

(b)  Chapter 28, Guaranty Associations.

(2)  The laws listed in Subsection (1) shall be construed together in a manner that is consistent.



Enacted by Chapter 309, 2007 General Session

